Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6319.18
Elevated blood-lead level, defined.

Elevated blood-lead level means a confirmed concentration of lead in whole blood of twenty micrograms of lead per deciliter of whole blood for a single venous test or of fifteen to nineteen micrograms of lead per deciliter of whole blood in two consecutive tests taken three to four months apart.

Laws 1999, LB 863, § 20.